Arkansas statutes. Title 8 Environmental Law
Chapter 13
Management Organization

Effective Dates.

Acts 1999, No. 1316, § 5: Apr. 12, 1999. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that it is vital that a management process be executed to improve our ability to protect and enhance the environment through the development and use of measurable environmental indicators. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

8-13-101. Purpose.

It is recognized that:

The improvement of the environment and the management of environmental concerns within the State of Arkansas are matters of interest to all citizens of this state;

Environmental protection and improvement could be enhanced by authorizing the Director of the Division of Environmental Quality to design and establish a management organization which incorporates specific goals for environmental protection and uses environmental indicators to measure agency performance; and

The director should execute a management process which:

Creates an integrated agency information system;

Organizes the Division of Environmental Quality according to business function;

Utilizes environmental indicators to measure progress in protecting and enhancing the environment;

Employs a collaborative public involvement process to define the environmental indicators to be used to measure environmental enhancement; and

Establishes a performance-based financial management system that links the funding of agency activities to environmental results.

History.

Acts 1999, No. 1316, § 1; 2019, No. 910, §§ 3018, 3019.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality” in (2) and (3)(B).

8-13-102. Authority to adopt alternative organization.

The Director of the Division of Environmental Quality, with the advice and consent of the Secretary of the Department of Energy and Environment, may establish any number of divisions, offices, or units for the conduct of environmental affairs of the state and may prescribe the functions and duties of each division, office, or unit.

Provided, however, that:

All functions and duties prescribed by a grant agreement with an entity of the United States Government shall be maintained for the duration of the grant agreement;

This section does not limit any provision of state law directing or requiring the Division of Environmental Quality to carry out any function or provide any service.

However, nothing in this section shall be construed to prevent the reassignment of functions or services assigned by state law where reassignment does not alter the obligation of the Division of Environmental Quality to continue providing such function or service;

Such reorganization shall be based on a comprehensive analysis of all of the functions and duties administered by the Division of Environmental Quality and the development of a ten-year strategic plan of Division of Environmental Quality operations; and

The conduct of such comprehensive analysis and the development of a strategic plan shall be financed by an appropriation or authorization of the General Assembly for these specific purposes.

History.

Acts 1999, No. 1316, § 1; 2019, No. 910, §§ 3020, 3021.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality” in (a) and (b)(2)(A); in (a), substituted “Secretary of the Department of Energy and Environment” for “Governor” and inserted “offices, or units” and “office, or unit”; and substituted “division” for “department” in (b)(2)(B) and twice in (b)(3).

8-13-103. Requirements for comprehensive analysis and strategic planning.

Any reorganization of the functions and duties for the conduct of environmental affairs through the provisions of this chapter shall be based on a comprehensive analysis of the existing operations of the Division of Environmental Quality and the development of a ten-year strategic plan for Division of Environmental Quality operations. Such strategic plan shall be reviewed and updated on an annual basis and shall be made available for public review through formal notice.

The comprehensive analysis of each division, function, and duty shall consist of the following requirements:

A comprehensive analysis of each existing division, function, and duty performed by the Division of Environmental Quality in providing environmental services; and

A comprehensive comparative analysis of the functions and duties to be performed through the proposed alternative organization with regard to improved efficiency, effectiveness, responsiveness, and accountability to the people.

The strategic plan shall outline a management organization for the Division of Environmental Quality that promotes environmental protection and enhancement.

Such management organization shall consist of the following requirements:

To establish an integrated agency information system that:

Ensures compatibility between state standards and facility identification and location data standards established by the United States Environmental Protection Agency;

Reduces reporting and record-keeping burdens on industry;

Establishes a public participation process to define and adopt reporting and data management reforms;

Measures improvements in waste reduction recycling of waste materials, conservation and reuse of resources, and pollution prevention; and

Expands public access to environmental performance information;

To institute environmental performance indicators to measure progress in protecting and enhancing the environment.

Such indicators shall emphasize waste reduction, recycling of waste materials, conservation and reuse of materials, and pollution prevention, and shall be formulated using numeric goals and expressed in plain language terms.

Such indicators shall be developed by a work group appointed by the Director of the Division of Environmental Quality consisting of representatives of the Division of Environmental Quality working in collaboration with representatives from state and federal agencies, city and county officials, nonprofit organizations, minority groups, industry, colleges and universities, civic groups, and other stakeholders in environmental affairs;

To organize the Division of Environmental Quality according to business functions and duties;

To establish a performance-based financial management system that links expenditures within divisions, functions, and duties to environmental protection and enhancement; and

To embody the above elements into a reorganization plan which provides for the scheduling of any transfer of functions and duties, acquisition of equipment, development of procedures, programming, records, documents, properties, assets, funds, liabilities, and bonding resulting from the proposed changes.

History.

Acts 1999, No. 1316, § 1; 2019, No. 910, §§ 3022-3026.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality” in (a) and (c)(2)(B)(iii); and substituted “division” for “department” throughout the section.